Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.330

Screenings—Removal required—Disposition.

(1) All screenings, removed in the cleaning or conditioning of seeds, which contain prohibited or restricted noxious weed seeds shall be removed from the seed conditioning plant only under conditions that will prevent weed seeds from being dispersed into the environment.

(2) The director may by regulation adopt requirements for moving, conditioning, and/or disposing of screenings.

[ 1981 c 297 s 11; 1979 c 154 s 1; 1969 c 63 s 33.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.

Severability—1979 c 154: "If any provision of this 1979 act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 154 s 27.]